Hawaii, session 2026, SB2802.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii faces a growing shortage in the education sector, with the current demand for educators exceeding the supply.  The legislature recommends expanding the capacity of education programs to help reduce the educator workforce shortage. The legislature further finds that the State is particularly bearing the brunt of the educator shortage.  Leeward community college currently offers an associate in science degree in teaching and six certificates of competence for various levels of education (Certificate of Competence, Alternative Certification in Teaching (Track I); Certificate of Competence, Alternative Certification in Teaching (Track II); Certificate of Competence, Culturally Responsive Teaching; Certificate of Competence, Special/Inclusive Education; Certificate of Competence, Special Education II; and Advanced Professional Certificate in Special Education, PK-12). Students who earn an associate in science degree in education must transfer to a bachelor's degree program in education at a university to further and complete their education. The legislature believes that offering a bachelor of science degree in education at Leeward community college will help increase the supply of educator graduates, reduce the educator workforce shortage, and allow students enrolled at the college to complete their entire course of study. The legislature also finds that the diversification and sustainability of agriculture is vital to the State's future.  A steady supply of workers having the appropriate knowledge to support these goals is essential.  The legislature believes that offering a bachelor of arts degree in agricultural science at Leeward community college will help grow the expertise needed to foster sustainable and diversified agriculture in the State. The legislature declares that the establishment of a bachelor of science degree program in education and a bachelor of arts degree program in agricultural science at Leeward community college is a matter of statewide concern pursuant to article X, section 6, of the Hawaii State Constitution. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate moneys for the establishment of a bachelor of science degree program in education and a bachelor of arts degree program in agricultural science at Leeward community college. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $750,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for: (1)  The establishment of a bachelor of science degree program in education at Leeward community college; (2)  The establishment of a bachelor of arts degree program in agricultural science at Leeward community college; (3)  Two full-time equivalent (2.00 FTE) positions to administer and support the programs; and (4)  Related supplies and equipment. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________